third_party/hyphenation-patterns/src/mr/hyph-mr.pat.txt
2‍2
1‌1
अ1
आ1
इ1
ई1
उ1
ऊ1
ऋ1
ॠ1
ऌ1
ॡ1
ए1
ऐ1
ओ1
औ1
ा1
ि1
ी1
ु1
ू1
ृ1
ॄ1
ॢ1
ॣ1
े1
ै1
ो1
ौ1
1क
1ख
1ग
1घ
1ङ
1च
1छ
1ज
1झ
1ञ
1ट
1ठ
1ड
1ढ
1ण
1त
1थ
1द
1ध
1न
1प
1फ
1ब
1भ
1म
1य
1र
1ल
1ळ
1व
1श
1ष
1स
1ह
2ँ1
2ं1
2ः1
2ऽ1
2॑1
2॒1
2्2
